Tennessee, session 114, HB0282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-246, is amended by deleting
subdivision (59).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-252, is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Tennessee wine and grape board, created by § 57-3-1101;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0282
000363
- 1 -